Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 14 Fertilizer

Cross references. —

As to requiring board of trustees of University of Wyoming to provide for operation of research station to conduct programs related to soils, vegetation diseases, fertilizers, etc., in order to effectuate reduction or elimination of causes detrimental to agriculture, see § 21-17-302(c).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 53.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 74 to 82.

§ 11-14-101.
Short
title.

This act shall be known
as the “Wyoming Fertilizer Law of 2009.”

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-193; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2009, ch. 92, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “2009” for “1971”.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-102.
Administration of provisions.

This act shall be administered
by the state department of agriculture, hereinafter referred to as
the department.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-194; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Brand” means a term, design or trademark used in connection with one (1) or several grades of commercial fertilizer;

“Bulk fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer distributed in a nonpackaged form;

“Commercial fertilizer” means any substance containing one (1) or more recognized plant nutrients used for its nutrient content and designed for use or claimed to have value in promoting plant growth;

“Deficient” means the amount of nutrient found by analysis less than that guaranteed which may result from a lack of nutrient ingredients or from lack of uniformity;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of agriculture;

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture;

“Distributor” means any person who imports, consigns, distributes, manufactures, produces, compounds, formulates, mixes, blends or applies commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment or who offers for sale, sells, barters or otherwise supplies commercial fertilizers, soil amendments or soil conditioners in this state. The distributor may also be the registrant;

“Grade” means the percentage of total nitrogen, available phosphorus or phosphate, and soluble potassium or soluble potash stated in whole numbers in the same terms, order and percentages as in the guaranteed analysis, and fertilizer materials, bone meal, manures and similar raw materials which may be guaranteed in fractional units;

“Guaranteed analysis” means the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed in the following order and form:

Total nitrogen (N) . . . . . percent
Available phosphate (P2O5) . . . . . percent
Soluble potash (K2O) . . . . . percent;

For unacidulated mineral phosphatic materials and basic slag, both total and available phosphate and the degree of fineness, and for bone, tankage and other organic phosphatic materials, total phosphate;

Additional plant nutrients when mentioned or claimed on the label, container or advertising material, shall be registered and guaranteed, and guarantees shall be made on the percentage elemental basis with sources of the elements shown. When any plant nutrients or other substances or compounds are guaranteed, they shall be subject to inspection and analysis in accord with the methods and regulations prescribed by the department;

Potential basicity or acidity expressed in terms of calcium carbonate equivalent in multiples of one hundred (100) pounds per ton.

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variations inherent in the taking, preparation and analysis of an official sample of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment;

“Label” means the display of all written, printed or graphic matter upon the container or statement accompanying a commercial fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner;

“Labeling” means all written, printed or graphic matter upon or accompanying any commercial fertilizer, or advertisements, brochures, posters and television or radio announcements used in promoting the sale of commercial fertilizers, soil amendments or soil conditioners;

“Mixed fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer containing any combination or mixture of fertilizer materials;

“Official sample” means any sample of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment taken by the director;

“Percent” or “percentage” means the percentage by weight;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, corporation, or organized group of persons whether incorporated or not;

“Primary nutrient” means the plant nutrients nitrogen (N), available phosphate (P2O5) or soluble potash (K2O);

“Registrant” means the person who registers commercial fertilizers, soil amendments or soil conditioners under the provisions of this act. The registrant may also be the distributor;

“Sell” or “sale” means exchange of ownership or transfer of custody;

“Soil amendment” or “soil conditioner” means any material which improves the physical or chemical soil characteristics and is manufactured and sold for such purposes but which is not added for its plant food content;

“Specialty fertilizer” means a commercial fertilizer distributed primarily for nonfarm use such as home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses and nurseries;

“Ton” means a net weight of two thousand (2,000) pounds avoirdupois;

“Organic fertilizer” means a material containing carbon and one (1) or more elements other than hydrogen and oxygen essential for plant growth, and allowed for use under the Organic Foods Production Act of 1990, as promulgated by the United States department of agriculture “National List of Allowed and Prohibited Substances” rule;

“Secondary or micro plant nutrients” means nutrients other than the primary nutrients that are essential for the normal growth of plants and that may need to be added to the growth medium. Secondary plant nutrients shall include calcium, magnesium and sulfur. Micro plant nutrients shall include boron, chlorine, cobalt, copper, iron, manganese, molybdenum, nickel, sodium and zinc;

“This act” means W.S.

11-14-101

through

11-14-118

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-195; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 46, § 2; 2009, ch. 92, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xvii) inserted “the plant nutrients” preceding “nitrogen”, deleted “phosphorus, and” preceding “soluble potash”, and deleted “or potassium” thereafter, and added the chemical elements following “nitrogen”, “phosphate”
and “soluble potash”, redesignated former (a)(xxviii) as (xxv), added (a)(xxviii) and (xxiv), and substituted “11-14-118” for “11-14-117” in (xxv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-14-104.
Registration of fertilizer, soil conditioner and soil amendments;
applications; fees; disposition thereof; exceptions.

Each brand and grade of commercial fertilizer shall be registered with the department before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted on forms furnished by the department and shall include the following information:

The brand and grade;

The guaranteed analysis;

The name and address of the registrant or the distributor;

The sources from which the nitrogen, phosphorus or phosphate and potassium are derived;

Additional plant nutrients, when claimed, the percentage guaranteed and the sources, provided, the minimum percentages which will be accepted for registration are those recognized by the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials.

Each soil conditioner and soil amendment shall be registered with the department before being distributed in this state. The application for registration shall be submitted on forms furnished by the department and shall include the following information:

The brand;

Guaranteed analysis on label;

The name and address of the registrant or the distributor.

A registration fee of one hundred fifteen dollars ($115.00) shall accompany each separate formula of brand and grade of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment to be registered. The registration expires on December 31 next following the date of application and shall be renewed annually. All registration fees collected shall be deposited in the state general fund and may be appropriated by the legislature for programs authorized by W.S. 11-2-202(a)(v),

11-14-101

through

11-14-116

and 11-16-105(a)(v).

A distributor or registrant is not required to register any commercial fertilizer, specialty fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment which is already registered under this act by another person if the label does not differ in any respect.

A distributor or registrant is not required to register each grade of commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment formulated according to specifications furnished by a consumer prior to preparation.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-196; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 147, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 2; 2020 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c), substituted “registration fee of one hundred fifteen dollars ($115.00)” for “registration fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00).”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-105.
Label
requirements.

Any commercial fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner distributed in this state in containers shall have affixed to the container a label setting forth in clearly legible and conspicuous form the information required by W.S. 11-14-104(a) and (b), the month and year of preparation or lot number, and shall show the net weight stated in both metric units and avoirdupois. In case of bulk shipments, this information in written or printed form shall accompany delivery and be supplied to the purchaser at time of delivery.

A commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment formulated according to specifications furnished by a consumer prior to mixing shall be labeled to show the net weight stated in both metric units and avoirdupois, guaranteed analysis and the name and address of the registrant or the distributor.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-197; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 2; 2009, ch. 92, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to misbranding fertilizer, see §

11-14-109

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), inserted “, the month and year of preparation or lot number,” in the first sentence.

§ 11-14-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993,
ch. 147, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 6, related to reports of sales to nonregistrants.

§ 11-14-107.
Sampling of fertilizer, soil amendment or soil conditioner.

The director or his designee shall sample, inspect, make analyses of and test commercial fertilizers, soil conditioners and soil amendments distributed within this state at any time and place and to the extent he deems necessary to determine whether they are in compliance with this act. The director or his designee may enter upon any premises or carriers during regular business hours to have access to commercial fertilizers, soil amendments or soil conditioners subject to the provisions of this act and to the records relating to their distribution.

The methods of sampling analysis shall be those adopted by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists (AOAC). In cases not covered by such methods, or in cases where methods are available in which improved applicability has been demonstrated, the department may adopt such appropriate methods from other sources.

The department in determining whether any commercial fertilizer is deficient in plant food shall be guided solely by the official sample obtained and analyzed as provided for in subsection (b) of this section.

Official samples establishing a penalty for nutrient deficiency shall be retained for a minimum of ninety (90) days from issuance of a deficiency report. A deficiency in an official sample of mixed fertilizer resulting from nonuniformity is not distinguishable from a deficiency due to actual plant nutrient shortage and is properly subject to official action.

For purposes of this act, the results of official analysis shall be final, unless it is determined by the director that a resample is warranted. Should a distributor or registrant request a resample of a fertilizer based upon the director’s findings of a deficiency, all costs associated with the resampling and analysis shall be borne by the distributor or registrant. If results of the resampling establish the results of first analysis were invalid, the department shall bear the costs associated with the resampling.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-199; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 46, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-108.
Reimbursement of purchaser of deficient fertilizer.

When a fertilizer is
deficient in any element beyond recognized investigational allowances,
the distributor or registrant must reimburse the purchaser of the
fertilizer an amount equal to double the current market value of the
fertilizer as determined by the state chemical and bacteriological
laboratory.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-200; W.S. 1977, §

11-17-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 2.

§ 11-14-109.
Misbranded
or adulterated fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment; distribution
of unregistered fertilizer.

No person shall distribute misbranded fertilizer, soil conditioners or soil amendments. A commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment is misbranded if:

Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular way, including being labeled organic fertilizer, when its use is not allowed pursuant to the United States department of agriculture “National List of Allowed and Prohibited Substances” rule;

It is distributed under the name of another fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment;

It is not labeled as required in W.S.

11-14-105

and in accordance with regulations prescribed under this act.

No person shall distribute an adulterated fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment. A commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment is adulterated if:

It contains any deleterious or harmful ingredient in sufficient amount to render it injurious to beneficial plant life when applied in accordance with directions for use on the label, or if adequate warning statements or directions for use which may be necessary to protect plant life are not shown upon the label;

Its composition falls below or differs from that which it is purported to possess by its labeling;

It contains unwanted crop seed or weed seed; or

A commercial fertilizer that contains guaranteed amounts of phosphates or micronutrients, contains metals in amounts greater than the levels of metals established by the following table:

Metal ppm per 1% PO 2 5 ppm per 1% micronutrients Arsenic 13 112 Cadmium 10 83 Cobalt 3,100 23,000* Lead 61 463 Mercury 1 6 Molybdenum 42 300* Nickel 250 1,900 Selenium 26 180 Zinc 420 2,900* (*only applies when not guaranteed)

Click to view

The table shall be used
according to the following three (3) situations:

For fertilizers with a phosphate guarantee, but no micronutrient guarantee, multiply the percent guaranteed P2O5 in the product by the values in the table to obtain the maximum allowable concentration of each metal. The minimum value for P2O5 utilized as a multiplier shall be six (6.0);

For fertilizers with one (1) or more micronutrient guarantee, but no phosphate guarantee, multiply the sum of the guaranteed percentages of all micronutrients in the product by the value in the appropriate column in the table to obtain the maximum allowable concentration (in parts per million, or ppm) of each metal. The minimum value for micronutrients utilized as a multiplier shall be one (1);

For fertilizers with both a phosphate and a micronutrient guarantee, multiply the guaranteed percent P2O5 by the value in the appropriate column. The minimum value for P2O5 utilized as a multiplier shall be one (1). Then, multiply the sum of the guaranteed percentages of the micronutrients by the value in the appropriate column. The minimum value for micronutrients utilized as a multiplier shall be one (1). Then, utilize the higher of the two (2) resulting values as the maximum allowable concentration (ppm) of each metal.

No person shall distribute unregistered fertilizers, soil conditioners or soil amendments.

No person shall distribute fertilizers, soil conditioners or soil amendments that are short weight. All provisions for enforcement of items found to be short weight shall be administered by the department under W.S.

40-10-117

through

40-10-136

of the weights and measures law.

Any penalties resulting from violations of these heavy metal standards shall accrue to the registrant of the material that violates the heavy metal standard.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 11-201; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-109; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1995, ch. 46, § 2; 2009, ch. 92, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the introductory language of (a)(i) added “including being labeled organic fertilizer, when its use is not allowed pursuant to the United States department of agriculture ‘National List of Allowed and Prohibited Substances’ rule”, added (b)(iv), and added (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995,
ch. 46, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 10, related to publication of distribution and analyses information.

§ 11-14-111.
Rules and regulations.

The director may prescribe
and enforce rules and regulations relating to investigational allowances,
definitions, records and the distribution of commercial fertilizers,
soil conditioners and soil amendments as necessary to carry out the
provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 11-203; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-112.
Refusal, suspension or cancellation of registration; hold orders;
release.

A registration may be refused, suspended or cancelled for any formula of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment as herein provided, upon evidence that the product is misbranded or adulterated. A hold order may be issued to the owner or custodian of any lot of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment to stop sale, use or removal and to hold at a designated place when the director finds the product is being offered for sale in violation of this act, until the law has been complied with and the product is released in writing by the director or the violation has been otherwise legally disposed of by a court of competent jurisdiction.

No person shall make any false or misleading representation with regard to any fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment sold, offered or exposed for sale by the person in this state, either as principal or agent. No person shall use any false, misleading or deceptive brand or grade in connection therewith. The penalties provided by subsection (a) of this section shall apply to any violation of this subsection.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 11-204; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-112; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 46, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-113.
Seizure and disposition of fertilizer found to be in violation; right
to application for release.

Any lot of commercial
fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment not in compliance with
this act is subject to seizure on complaint of the department to a
court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the commercial
fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment is located. If the
court finds the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment
to be in violation of this act and orders the condemnation of the
commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment, it shall
be disposed of in any manner consistent with the quality of the commercial
fertilizer and the laws of the state, but in no instance shall the
disposition of the commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil
amendment be ordered by the court without first giving the claimant
an opportunity to apply to the court for release of the commercial
fertilizer to bring it into compliance with this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 11-205; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-113; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-114.
Notice of violation; hearing; penalty; duty of district attorney;
injunctions.

If examination of any commercial fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment indicates that this act or the rules and regulations issued thereunder have been violated, the director shall give notice of the violations and an opportunity for a hearing to the registrant or distributor. If it appears after the hearing that this act or rules and regulations issued thereunder have been violated, the director may certify the facts to the proper district attorney.

Any person convicted of violating this act or the rules and regulations issued thereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense, or the director may apply to the district court for the purpose of preventing further violation.

The director is not required to report for prosecution or for the institution of seizure proceedings minor violations when he believes that the public interests will be best served by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

Each district attorney to whom any violation is reported shall cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction without delay. Violations of this act may be enjoined by proceedings brought by the district attorney of the proper county, or by the attorney general, regardless of whether criminal proceedings have been instituted, provided the director has entered a finding pursuant to this act.

The director may apply for and the court may grant a temporary or permanent injunction, without bond, restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate this act or any rule or regulation promulgated under the act notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 11-206; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-114; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 46, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions generally, see ch. 28 of title 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-115.
Action
for damages to crops; evidence.

Nothing in this act shall preclude the right of a purchaser to bring an action for any damages to crops, land or livestock by reason of misbranded, adulterated or deficient fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment.

The department shall, upon demand, make all results of samplings, inspections and laboratory analyses available to any purchaser of fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment.

In a civil action for damages against any distributor or manufacturer of any misbranded or deficient fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment, all results of the department samplings, inspections or laboratory analyses shall be competent evidence before any court where such civil action is pending.

The results of a criminal action for violation of this act is competent evidence in any civil action for misbranding or deficiency of any fertilizer, soil conditioner or soil amendment.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 204, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-207; W.S. 1977, §

11-16-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2009, ch. 92, § 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a) inserted “, adulterated” following “misbranded”.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-116.
Sales between importers, manufacturers or manipulators excepted from
provisions.

Nothing in this act shall
restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of commercial fertilizers, soil
conditioners or soil amendments to each other by importers, manufacturers
or manipulators who mix fertilizer materials for sale, or prevent
the free and unrestricted shipment of commercial fertilizers, soil
conditioners or soil amendments to manufacturers or manipulators who
have registered their brands as required by this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 88, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 11-208; W.S. 1977, § 11-17-115; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

Severability. —

Section 16, chapter 88, Laws 1971, reads: “If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this Act shall for any reason be judged invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in the operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered.”

§ 11-14-117.
Cooperation with other entities.

The department may cooperate
with and enter into agreement with governmental agencies of this state,
other states, agencies of the federal government and any nongovernmental
entity in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 46, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-14-103(a)(xxv).

§ 11-14-118.
Registration of ammonium nitrate.

[2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 92, provides this section is
effective on and after July 1, 2009 only upon certification of the
governor to the secretary of state that the United States department
of homeland security has published final federal rules under H.R.
2764, Subtitle J, Secure Handling of Ammonium Nitrate or its successor.
As of the date of the publication of the 2019 Wyoming statutes no
such certification had been made.]

Any person who possesses ammonium nitrate or regulated ammonium nitrate materials shall be registered with the department. The registration application shall be on a form approved by the director in consultation with and upon the recommendation of the director of the office of homeland security. The director shall charge an annual registration fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00). Nothing in this section shall require the registration of any person who produces, sells or purchases ammonium nitrate exclusively for use in the production of an explosive under a license or permit issued under chapter 40 of title 18, U.S.C.

Ammonium nitrate and regulated ammonium nitrate materials shall be secured to provide reasonable protection against vandalism, theft or other unauthorized use. Reasonable protection may include, but not be limited to, ensuring that storage facilities are fenced and locked when unattended, and inspected daily for signs of attempted entry or vandalism to any storage facility. The director in consultation with or upon the recommendation of the director of the office of homeland security, may recommend other security measures. The director shall work in consultation with or upon the recommendation of the director of the office of homeland security to provide information to ammonium nitrate users on appropriate security measures.

A distributor shall record the date of sale and quantity sold, the valid state or federal driver’s license number, the current physical address and telephone number for the purchaser of ammonium nitrate or regulated ammonium nitrate materials. If the purchaser obtains physical possession of ammonium nitrate or regulated ammonium nitrate material, the distributor shall obtain the registrant’s registration number as a condition of completing the sale. A registrant, if not a distributor, shall record the date of application. All sale and application records shall be retained by each registrant for a period of not less than two (2) years.

Registrants shall comply with all federal and state requirements regarding the dissemination of any information, providing the director and the director of the office of homeland security access to the records.

For the purposes of this section:

“Ammonium nitrate” means chiefly the ammonium salt of nitric acid. Ammonium nitrate shall not contain less than thirty-three percent (33%) nitrogen, one-half (1/2) of which is the ammonium form and one-half (1/2) of which is the nitrate form;

“Regulated ammonium nitrate materials” means regulated ammonium nitrate material fertilizer products which have been determined by the director in consultation with and upon the recommendation of the director of the office of homeland security to warrant regulation based on the potential explosive capacity of the fertilizer material determined by the ammonium nitrate content.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 92, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “Section 2 of this act shall be effective only if the United States department of homeland security publishes final federal rules under H.R. 2764, Subtitle J, Secure Handling of Ammonium Nitrate or its successor. The governor shall certify to the secretary of state the occurrence of the publication of such final federal rules and section 2 of this act shall be effective on the date the certification is filed with the secretary of state. In preparing copy for printing and arranging and furnishing copies of this act for the printer of the session laws or the Wyoming statutes, the legislative service office is authorized to display the provisions of this act in a manner which most effectively displays the contingencies provided in this act.”